Hawaii statutes.
§709-904 Endangering the welfare of a minor
in the second degree. (1) Except as provided in section 709-903.5(2), a
person commits the offense of endangering the welfare of a minor in the second
degree if, having care or custody of a minor, the person:

(a) Recklessly allows another person
to inflict serious or substantial bodily injury on the minor; or

(b) Recklessly causes or permits the
minor to inject, ingest, inhale, or otherwise introduce into the minor's body
any controlled substance listed in sections 329-14, 329-16, 329-18, and 329-20
that has not been prescribed by a physician for the minor, except as permitted
under section 329-122. This subsection shall not apply to nursing mothers who
may cause the ingestion or introduction of detectable amounts of any controlled
substance listed in sections 329-14, 329-16, 329-18, and 329-20 to their minor
children through breastfeeding.

(2) A person commits the offense of
endangering the welfare of a minor in the second degree if, being a parent,
guardian, or other person whether or not charged with the care or custody of a
minor, the person knowingly endangers the minor's physical or mental welfare by
violating or interfering with any legal duty of care or protection owed such
minor.

(3) Endangering the welfare of a minor in the
second degree is a misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 198, §1;
am L 1986, c 314, §71; am L 2006, c 230, §45 and c 249, §2; am L 2008, c 81, §2]

COMMENTARY ON §709-904

[The Proposed Draft as well as the Code as adopted had
limited this offense to a parent, guardian, or other person charged with the
care or custody of the minor. In 1974, this was broadened to include persons
who were not charged with the care or custody of the minor. (See Supplemental
Commentary on §709-904.) This Commentary is based on the original wording
prior to the 1974 amendment.]

This section provides a penal sanction for the violation of a
duty of care and protection which the civil law relating to minors places upon
parents, guardians, and other persons charged with the care or custody of a
minor. In a sense this offense is residual. Specific types of conduct which
may endanger the welfare of minors are treated separately in §709-902
(abandonment) and §709-903 (persistent nonsupport). However, prosecutions for
abandonment and persistent nonsupport do not depend upon a showing that the
abandonment or nonsupport actually endangered the welfare of the child. For
example, abandonment of a child in a police station or an orphanage may, if the
parent is not suitable and beyond rehabilitation, be in the interest of the
child. Yet, under such circumstances, a prosecution for abandonment could be
maintained. Similarly, an exceedingly poor parent may refuse to support his
child and thereby cause a more wealthy relative to furnish support beyond the
means of the parent; even so, the persistent refusal would constitute an
offense. Section 709-904 involves violations of legal duties which do in fact
endanger the welfare of the child. If a person knowingly endangers the welfare
of a minor by violating a legal duty of support or non-desertion, it matters
not that the nonsupport was sporadic or that the desertion was not with intent
to abandon.

The Model Penal Code commentary, in discussing the section of
that Code from which this section is derived, observed that

its significance lies as much in what
it does not make criminal as in what it does penalize. Notably, it will not be
an offense under this or any other Section of the Code to "contribute to
the delinquency" or "corrupt the morals" of a child, although
nearly all American jurisdictions now have laws couched in these terms, often
incorporated in the juvenile court acts.

Authorities concerned with the
welfare of children have disavowed the loosely drawn statutes against
contributing to delinquency. Experience has shown that such statutes are
almost always invoked in situations specifically dealt with by other Sections
of the Code, especially those concerned with sexual offenses. To the extent of
the overlap, there is no need for the contributing statute. More important,
the existence of this overlapping catch-all has been, and would under this Code
continue to be, a means of avoiding legislative judgments, made in other
sections dealing with specific offenses on such matters as mens rea,
punishability of consensual intercourse, proper grading of offenses,
corroboration of complaining witnesses, and adequacy of proof generally.
Finally, the contributing legislation embraces such a vast range of behavior as
to make it completely meaningless as a criminologic category, treating as one
class, for example, a rapist, a dealer who buys stolen junk from a
fifteen-year-old boy, a narcotics peddler who lures high school children into
drug addiction, and a parent who keeps his child out of schools where flag
saluting is required.

The basic error that appears to
account for the prevalence of the legislation here disapproved is the
assumption that the comprehensive terms in which jurisdiction is commonly
conferred upon juvenile courts over "delinquent, dependent or neglected"
children are also appropriate to define a criminal offense. It is one thing to
give broad scope to an authority to promote the welfare of children, but quite
another thing to give a criminal court equivalent latitude in defining crimes
for which adults shall be punished. The vagueness of current statutes in this
field presents serious constitutional problems in the light of the decision in
Musser v. Utah.[1]

The definition of this offense limits its application to
cases where the victim is under 18 years of age. This limit is set on the
theory that in modern society persons 18 and 19 years of age are not, by virtue
of their minority status, especially susceptible to the adverse effects which
result from breaches of civil duties relating to the welfare of minors. If the
behavior of the parent or guardian presents a serious danger to the minor,
another offense, addressed specifically to the danger, can be employed, e.g.,
assault, reckless endangering, etc.

Previous Hawaii law reflected the standard failure to
distinguish the broad jurisdiction of the Family Court[2] from that conduct of
adults toward children which ought properly to be regarded as criminal. The
governing section provided:

Any parent, or legal guardian, or
person having the custody of any minor within the purview of chapter 571
establishing the Family Court, or any other person who knowingly or wilfully
encourages, aids, causes, abets, or connives at the acts or does anything that
directly produces, promotes, or contributes to the conditions which bring the
minor within the purview of chapter 571, or who wilfully neglects to do that
which will directly tend to prevent the acts or conditions that bring the minor
within the purview of chapter 571, shall be fined not more than $200 or
imprisoned not more than one year, or both.[3]

The vagueness and lack of specificity was aggravated by a
provision that the above section be construed liberally, i.e., to extend liability.[4]

The Code provides a degree of specificity by requiring that,
for liability to attach, the actor must violate a legal duty of care or
protection. The scope of the section is limited, necessarily, to those persons
(parents, guardian, or others) charged with the care and custody of the minor.

SUPPLEMENTAL COMMENTARY ON §709-904

Act 198, Session Laws 1974, amended this section so as to
apply to a parent, guardian, or other person whether or not charged with the
custody of a minor and so as to include the interference with, as well as the
violation of, any legal duty of care or protection owed to the minor.

In Standing Committee Report No. 130-74 the Senate Judiciary
Committee stated:

It will be possible to prosecute
persons who harbor runaway juveniles and who assist them in any illegal
activities under the rewording of §709-904.

Your Committee on Judiciary would
also like to emphasize that in the approval of this bill, there is no intent on
their part to interfere with the practices and beliefs of the Christian
Scientist population of the State of Hawaii.

Act 314, Session Laws 1986, provided that a person is
criminally liable for recklessly allowing another person to inflict serious or
substantial bodily injury on a minor. Persons charged with this offense may
defend on the ground that they reasonably believed they would incur serious or
substantial bodily injury by acting to prevent the harm to the minor.
Conference Committee Report No. 51-86.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, amended subsection (3) to clarify
that endangering the welfare of a minor in the second degree is a misdemeanor.

Act 249, Session Laws 2006, expanded the crime of endangering
the welfare of a minor in the second degree to include causing or permitting a
minor to ingest methamphetamine. Conference Committee Report No. 84-06.

Act 81, Session Laws 2008, amended subsection (1) to include
in the offense causing or permitting a minor to inject, ingest, inhale, or
otherwise introduce into the minor's body, any controlled substance listed in
schedules I through IV not prescribed by a physician, excluding the medical use
of marijuana. Act 81 exempted nursing mothers who may cause the ingestion or
introduction of detectable amounts of any controlled substance listed in schedules
I through IV to their minor children by breastfeeding. The legislature found
that the Act would provide greater protection for the health and safety of the
children of Hawaii, and was necessary because of the high risk of injury caused
by the ingestion of schedule I, II, III, and IV controlled substances.
Conference Committee Report No. 55-08, Senate Standing Committee Report No.
3415.

__________

§709-904 Commentary:

1. M.P.C., Tentative Draft No. 9, comments at 183-184 (1959).
Cf. Musser v. Utah, 333 U.S. 95 (1948). Among the questionable convictions
which have resulted from the vagueness of current statutes, the M.P.C.
commentary cites: State v. Davis, 58 Ariz. 444, 120 P.2d 808 (1942) (parent
contributed to delinquency of a minor by encouraging, on religious grounds,
refusal to salute the flag, which led to child's expulsion from school [but cf.
Partain v. State, 77 Okla. Crim. 270, 141 P.2d 124 (1943), holding compulsory
flag saluting statutes unconstitutional]); State v. Scallon, 201 La. 1026, 10
So.2d 885 (1942) ("accused permitted daughter under 17 to go to a
nightclub"); State v. Sobelman, 119 Minn. 232, 271 N.W. 484 (1937) (tavern
owner convicted for contributing to the delinquency of 16 year old girl who had
been drinking in tavern without owner's knowledge); In re Lewis, 193 Misc. 676,
84 N.Y. Supp. 2d 790 (Children's Ct. 1948) (offense consisted of employing a 15
year old boy "to work in a bowling alley where the boy was able to see
money placed in a desk and succumbed to the temptation to steal" it);
People v. Lew, 78 Cal. App. 2d 178, 177 P.2d 60 (1947) ("acquittal of
statutory rape despite indubitable proof of intercourse; conviction of
contributing to delinquency despite clear proof that the girl 'victim' was a
prostitute"); and State v. Harris, 105 W. Va. 165, 141 S.E. 637 (1928)
(defendant convicted of contributing to delinquency "for taking a
fifteen-year-old girl out riding against her father's orders and remaining out
until eleven o'clock, although the girl asked for the ride").

2. See H.R.S. §§571-11 through 571-14.

3. H.R.S. §577-8. In an attempt to eliminate outmoded
phrases, the Revisor of Statutes changed the language of R.L.H. §330-6 (1955)
considerably when the Revised Laws were recodified as the Hawaii Revised
Statutes [1968].

4. Id. §577-11 which provides: "Sections 577-8 to 577-11
shall be liberally construed in favor of the State for the purpose of the
protection of the child from neglect, or omission of parental duty toward the
child by its parents, and further to protect the child from the effects of the
improper conduct or acts of any person which may cause, encourage, or
contribute to the dependency or delinquency of the child, although the person
is in no way related to the child."

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next